District of Columbia statutes.
26-912

Exemption of certain loans; severability.

(a)

No provision of this chapter shall apply with respect to any loan, or to the making of any loan:

(1)

To any corporation which is unable to plead any statutes against usury in any action;

(2)

Repealed;

(3)

Secured on real estate located outside of the District of Columbia;

(4)

To a borrower residing, doing business, or incorporated outside of the District of Columbia; or

(5)

Greater than $25,000.

(b)

If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the section, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History

Feb. 4, 1913, ch. 26, § 14
Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 679, Pub. L. 92-200, § 9(a)
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-188, § 2(e), (f), 33 DCR 7687

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-712.
1973 Ed., § 26-612.